Washington statutes.
RCW 43.59.140

Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug—Information and education.

The Washington traffic safety commission shall produce and disseminate through all possible media, informational and educational materials explaining the extent of the problems caused by drinking drivers, the need for public involvement in their solution, and the penalties of existing and new laws against driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug.

[ 1991 c 290 s 4; 1983 c 165 s 42.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding, intent—Effective dates—Severability—1983 c 165: See notes following RCW 46.20.308.